Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2254
Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision; administrators; duties.

The compact administrator appointed pursuant to the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision shall delegate to the probation administrator authority and responsibility for:

(1) Implementation and administration of the compact as it affects probationers; and

(2) Supervision of probationers either sentenced to probation within the state and supervised in another state or placed on probation in another state and supervised within this state pursuant to the compact.

Laws 1971, LB 680, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 6.
Laws 2003, LB 46, section 51, provided this section became operative "when thirty-five states have adopted the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision". By June 2002, the compact had reached this threshold. (See www.interstatecompact.org.) LB 46 became effective May 24, 2003.
Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, see section 29-2639.